Yamls/N-bab_gt-norm.yaml
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [баббескӧт, баббезыскӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [баббестӧг, баббезыстӧг, баббезтӧгьяс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [баббесла, баббезысла]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [баббесся, баббезысся]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: баббезас
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [баббезсис, баббесис]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: баббезас
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [баббеслань, баббезыслань, баббезланяс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [баббессянь, баббезыссянь, баббезсяняс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [баббезӧттяс, баббезӧттис]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [баббезӧдззас, баббезӧдззис]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: баббесви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: баббезланяс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: баббезланьсис
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: баббезланяс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [баббезланьсяняс, баббесланьсянь, баббезысланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [баббезланьӧттяс, баббезланьӧттис, баббесланьӧт, баббезысланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [баббезланьӧдззаc, баббезланьӧдззиc, баббесланьӧдз, баббезысланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: баббесланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: баббезным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: баббезнымлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: баббезнымлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: баббезнымлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: баббезнымӧс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: баббезнаным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl1: баббезнымкӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [баббезнымтӧг, баббезтӧгьяным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: баббезнымла
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: баббезнымся
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: баббезаным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [баббезсиным, баббесиным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: баббезаным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [баббезнымлань, баббезланяным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [баббезнымсянь, баббезсяняным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [баббезӧттяным, баббезӧттиным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [баббезӧдззаным, баббезӧдззиным]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: баббезнымви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: баббезланяным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl1: баббезланьсиным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: баббезланяным
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [баббезланьсяняным, баббезнымланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [баббезланьӧттяным, баббезланьӧттиным, баббезнымланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [баббезланьӧдззаным, баббезланьӧдззиным, баббезнымланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: баббезнымланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: баббезныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: баббезнытлӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: баббезнытлісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: баббезнытлӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: баббезнытӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: баббезнаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl2: баббезныткӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [баббезныттӧг, баббезтӧгьяныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: баббезнытла
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: баббезнытся
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: баббезаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [баббезсиныт, баббесиныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: баббезаныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [баббезнытлань, баббезланяныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [баббезнытсянь, баббезсяняныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [баббезӧттяныт, баббезӧттиныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [баббезӧдззаныт, баббезӧдззиныт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: баббезнытви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: баббезланяныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl2: баббезланьсиныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: баббезланяныт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [баббезланьсяняныт, баббезнытланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [баббезланьӧттяныт, баббезланьӧттиныт, баббезнытланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [баббезланьӧдззаныт, баббезланьӧдззиныт, баббезнытланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: баббезнытланьви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: баббезныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: баббезныслӧн
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: баббезныслісь
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: баббезныслӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: баббезнысӧ
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: баббезнаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Com+PxPl3: баббезныскӧт
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [баббезныстӧг, баббезтӧгьяныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: баббезнысла
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: баббезнысся
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: баббезаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [баббезсиныс, баббесиныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: баббезаныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [баббезныслань, баббезланяныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [баббезныссянь, баббезсяняныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [баббезӧттяныс, баббезӧттиныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [баббезӧдззаныс, баббезӧдззиныс]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: баббезнысви
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: баббезланяныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEla+PxPl3: баббезланьсиныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: баббезланяныс
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [баббезланьсяняныс, баббезнысланьсянь]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [баббезланьӧттяныс, баббезланьӧттиныс, баббезнысланьӧт]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [баббезланьӧдззаныс, баббезланьӧдззиныс, баббезнысланьӧдз]
     баб+N+Anim+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: баббезнысланьви
